Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
Treatment of Juvenile Sex Offenders

635.500.
Operation of treatment program for juvenile sexual offenders — Purpose.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall operate a program for the treatment of juvenile sexual offenders, referred to in KRS

635.500

to

635.545

as the “program.”

The general purpose of the program shall be to provide early intervention and treatment of the juvenile sexual offender in an effort to affect the progression to adult criminal activity. Recognizing the significance of these offenses, the program shall endeavor to deter repeat offenses through mandatory follow-up and serve to protect potential victims in the community.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 94, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 50, effective July 1, 1997.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(3), the amendment of this statute by Section 50 of that Act becomes effective July 1, 1997, in that it deals with functions of the Department of Juvenile Justice.

635.505.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

The “treatment program” means a continuum of services provided in community and institutional settings designed to provide early intervention and treatment services for juvenile sexual offenders.

A “juvenile sexual offender” as used in this chapter means an individual who was at the time of the commission of the offense under the age of eighteen (18) years who is not actively psychotic or an individual with an intellectual disability and who has been adjudicated guilty of or has been convicted of or pled guilty to:

A felony under KRS Chapter 510;

Any other felony committed in conjunction with a misdemeanor described in KRS Chapter 510;

Any felony under KRS

506.010

when the crime attempted is a felony or misdemeanor described in KRS Chapter 510;

An offense under KRS

530.020

;

An offense under KRS 530.064(1)(a);

An offense under KRS

531.310

; or

A misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510.

A “juvenile sexual offender assessment” means an assessment of the child’s adolescent social development, medical history, educational history, legal history, family history, substance abuse history, sexual history, treatment history, and recent behaviors, which shall be prepared in order to assist the courts in determining whether the child should be declared a juvenile sexual offender, and to provide information regarding the risk for reoffending and recommendations for treatment.

“Individual with an intellectual disability” as used in this section means a juvenile with a full scale intelligent quotient of seventy (70) or below.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 94, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 538, § 14, effective April 13, 1998; 2002, ch. 263, § 8, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 182, § 66, effective July 12, 2006; 2012, ch. 146, § 143, effective July 12, 2012.

635.510.
Criteria for classification as juvenile sexual offender — Juvenile sexual offender assessment.

A child, thirteen (13) years of age or older at the time of the commission of the offense, shall be declared a juvenile sexual offender if the child has been adjudicated guilty of an offense listed in KRS 635.505(2)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f).

A child, less than thirteen (13) years of age, may be declared a juvenile sexual offender if the child has been adjudicated guilty of an offense listed in KRS 635.505(2).

Any child, thirteen (13) years of age or older, may be declared a juvenile sexual offender if the child has been adjudicated guilty of an offense listed in KRS 635.505(2)(g).

Upon final adjudication by the juvenile court under subsection (2) of this section, the juvenile court judge shall order a juvenile sexual offender assessment to be conducted on the child by the Department of Juvenile Justice treatment program or by a qualified professional approved by the program which shall recommend whether the child be declared a sexual offender and receive sexual offender treatment. Upon receipt of the findings of the assessment, the juvenile court judge shall determine whether the child shall be declared a juvenile sexual offender, and, if so, shall initiate a referral to the Department of Juvenile Justice treatment program for treatment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 94, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 62, effective July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 538, § 15, effective April 13, 1998; 2002, ch. 263, § 9, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 160, § 7, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 182, § 54, effective July 12, 2006.

635.515.
Treatment time — Treatment agreement — Reports — Reviews.

A child declared a juvenile sexual offender shall be committed to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice and shall receive sexual offender treatment for not more than three (3) years, except that this period of sexual offender treatment may be extended for one (1) additional year by the sentencing court upon motion of the Department of Juvenile Justice, and the juvenile sexual offender shall not remain in the care of the Department of Juvenile Justice after the age of twenty-one (21) years.

Based on the assessment and evaluation of the juvenile sexual offender and his family, the Department of Juvenile Justice shall utilize the treatment setting which provides the least restrictive alternative as defined in KRS

600.020

.

The program shall develop a written treatment agreement upon the child’s placement in a community setting, detailing the responsibilities of the juvenile sexual offender, his family, and the program to include but not be limited to: attendance; participation in education; participation in planning and completion of treatment goals; curfew; visit of appropriate staff to the home; participation in parenting groups and family counseling; continued contact with the program, schools, and courts; insurance of legal rights; and discharge criteria.

The written treatment agreement shall be presented to the court, and the court shall include the agreement as part of the order except for good cause shown.

The program shall be responsible for sending written reports every sixty (60) days to the juvenile court judge concerning the participation of the juvenile sexual offender and family in the treatment program. The written report shall include information about the treatment received by the juvenile sexual offender and family, an assessment of the sexual offender’s current condition, and recommendations by the program staff.

The case may be called for review upon the recommendation of the program staff or by the juvenile court judge at any time during the course of treatment. The review may be called to consider documentation of noncompliance, absenteeism, or unwillingness to acknowledge responsibility for sexually inappropriate behavior which may be remedied through the contempt powers of the court.

A court review shall be requested by the program sixty (60) days prior to the recommended program release date. The juvenile court judge shall schedule a hearing to formally consider the recommendation of release from the program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 94, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, §§ 51 and 63, effective July 1, 1997; 1998, ch. 538, § 16, effective April 13, 1998; 2002, ch. 263, § 10, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 182, § 55, effective July 12, 2006.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). In 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, this statute was amended by both Sections 51 and 63 of that Act. Although the changes made in these two sections are almost identical, there is a minor difference between them, and Section 63 prevails, as the last section in order of position. See
Home Folks Mobile Homes, Inc. v. Revenue Cabinet,
Ky. App., 700 S.W.2d 75 (1985).

635.520.
Responsibility for design of program — Agreements with public and private agencies.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall have the sole authority and responsibility for establishing the design of the juvenile sexual offender treatment program but shall consult with the Administrative Office of the Courts and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

The Department of Juvenile Justice may enter into agreements with public or private agencies in order to implement and operate the juvenile sexual offender treatment program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 94, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 52, effective July 1, 1997; 1998, ch. 426, § 623, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 672, effective June 20, 2005.

635.525.
Maintenance of data — Annual report.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall maintain complete and comprehensive data on each juvenile sexual offender participating in the program and shall compile an annual statistical report on the program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 94, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 53, effective July 1, 1997.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(3), the amendment of this statute by Section 53 of that Act becomes effective July 1, 1997, in that it deals with functions of the Department of Juvenile Justice.

635.527.
Disclosure of communications made in course of sexual offender’s diagnosis and treatment.

Communications made in the application for or in the course of a child sexual offender’s diagnosis and treatment in the program, between a sexual offender or member of the sexual offender’s family and any employee of the department who is assigned to work in the program, or any approved provider as defined in KRS

17.500

, shall be privileged from disclosure in any civil or criminal proceeding, other than proceedings to determine the sentence, unless the sexual offender consents in writing to the disclosure or the communication is related to an ongoing criminal investigation. The privilege created by this section shall not extend to disclosures made for the purpose of determining whether the sexual offender should continue to participate in the program. The provisions of KRS

620.030

shall not apply to a communication made, received, or overheard if the communication is made pursuant to this section. The child sexual offender shall be informed in writing of the limits of the privilege created by this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 263, § 7, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 182, § 53, effective July 12, 2006.

635.530.
Juvenile Sexual Offender Treatment Board. [Repealed.]

635.535.
Permanent committee to assume board duties after June 30, 1995. [Repealed.]

635.540.
Board meetings — Annual report. [Repealed.]

635.545.
File of participants to be maintained — Biennial report on whether participants later committed sex-related or other criminal offenses.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall maintain on file the names and identities of program participants for a period of fifteen (15) years following their participation in the program. The names and identities shall not be disclosed except for the purposes allowed in this section.

On a biennial basis, the Department of Juvenile Justice shall request from the Administrative Office of the Courts and the Department of Kentucky State Police information concerning whether any of the individuals who participated in the program have been arrested, tried, convicted, or incarcerated for any offense under KRS Chapter 510, KRS

530.020

, 530.064(1)(a), or

531.310

, or any other criminal offense.

Each two (2) years, the Department of Juvenile Justice shall compile the information obtained and present it to the Governor, the Legislative Research Commission, and the Supreme Court. The report shall not contain the names of any of the individual participants but shall contain identifying information which may assist in the evaluation of the program and in determination of whether participants have engaged in further criminal behavior as juveniles or adults.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 94, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 54, effective July 1, 1997; 2006, ch. 182, § 67, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 333, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(3), the amendment of this statute by Section 54 of that Act becomes effective July 1, 1997, in that it deals with functions of the Department of Juvenile Justice.